New York, session 2025-2026, S8379.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 7 of section 64 of the alcoholic beverage 2 control law is amended by adding a new paragraph (e-17) to read as 3 follows: 4 (e-17) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subdi- 5 vision, the authority may issue a retail license for on-premises 6 consumption for a premises which shall be located within two hundred 7 feet of a building occupied as a church, synagogue or other place of 8 worship, provided such premises constitute a premises for the sale of 9 food or beverages at retail for consumption on the premises located 10 wholly within the boundaries of the county of Queens, bounded and 11 described as follows: 12 ALL that certain plot, piece or parcel of land, situate, lying and 13 being in the Borough and County of Queens, City and State of New York, 14 bounded and described as follows: 15 BEGINNING at a point on the southerly side of Skillman Avenue, distant 16 44 feet easterly from the corner formed by the intersection of the east- 17 erly side of 48th Street, formerly Grosman Avenue, with the southerly 18 side of Skillman Avenue; 19 RUNNING THENCE southerly at right angles to Skillman Avenue and part 20 of the distance through a party wall 74.20 feet; 21 THENCE Easterly parallel with the southerly side of Skillman Avenue, 22 19 feet; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13349-01-5 S. 8379 2 1 THENCE northerly again at right angles to Skillman Avenue and part of 2 the distance through a party wall 74.20 feet to the southerly side of 3 Skillman Avenue; 4 THENCE westerly along the southerly side of Skillman Avenue, 19 feet 5 to the point or place of BEGINNING. 6 TOGETHER with the Bakery over and improvement on the property imme- 7 diately adjoining on the East which is subject to an Easement in favor 8 of the owner on the West to maintain an encroachment of a part of the 9 building as it now stands upon the Southwest portion of his premises 10 immediately adjourning on the East more particularly bound and described 11 in Deed dated October 15, 1970, recorded in Reel 433 page 874, by which 12 conveyance title to the premises herein. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.